src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The GERMAN language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PROP_Afrika__np
+N+Prop+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Neu+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ

LEXICON PROP_Frankreich__np
+N+Prop+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON PROP_Niederlande__np
+N+Prop+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Neu+Use/NG:ʼ SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ

LEXICON PROP_Ostsee__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON PROP_Schweiz__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON PROP_Vereinte_Nationen__np
+N+Prop+Fem: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;

LEXICON PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
LEXICON PROP-SUR_Botha__np
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: SG-GENʼs ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: SG-GENʼs ;
LEXICON PROP-SUR_Hughes__np
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+Use/NG+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Fem: SG-GENʼ ;
+Use/NG+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Msc: SG-GENʼ ;


LEXICON PROP_Wynand__np
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON PROP_Harry__np
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Msc+Use/NG: SG-GENʼs ;

LEXICON PROP_Anrie__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON PROP_Maria__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ

LEXICON PROP_Beatrix__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Use/NG:ʼ SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ

LEXICON PROP_van_der_Merwe__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;!! FIXME
LEXICON PROP_Botha__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ; !! FIXME
+N+Prop+Msc+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ

LEXICON PROP_Hughes__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Use/NG:ʼ SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ; !! FIXME
+N+Prop+Msc+Use/NG:ʼ SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ

LEXICON PROP_Wikipedia__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ; !! FIXME
+N+Prop+Msc+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ
+N+Prop+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Neu+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ

LEXICON PROP_Apertium__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ; !! FIXME
+N+Prop+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON PROP_Linux__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Use/NG:ʼ SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ; !! FIXME
+N+Prop+Msc+Use/NG:ʼ SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ
+N+Prop+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Neu+Use/NG:ʼ SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ

LEXICON PROP_NATO__np
+N+Prop+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Fem+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ
+N+Prop+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ; !! FIXME
+N+Prop+Msc+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ
+N+Prop+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Prop+Neu+Use/NG:ʼs SG-GEN ; !! CHECKME ʼ


LEXICON ProperNounCases
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
+N+Prop:%:   Cases  ;
        -    Nouns  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
