src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Propernoun
Amerika+Sem/Plc:Amerika PROP_Afrika__np ;
Amsterdam+Sem/Plc:Amsterdam PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Angola+Sem/Plc:Angola PROP_Afrika__np ;
Äquatorial-Guinea+Sem/Plc:Äquatorial-Guinea PROP_Afrika__np ;
Armenien+Sem/Plc:Armenien PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Australazien+Sem/Plc:Australazien PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Big% Ben+Sem/Plc:Big% Ben PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Bordeaux+Sem/Plc:Bordeaux PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Boston+Sem/Plc:Boston PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Bretagne+Sem/Plc:Bretagne PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Bulgarien+Sem/Plc:Bulgarien PROP_Afrika__np ;
Cardiff+Sem/Plc:Cardiff PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Chicago+Sem/Plc:Chicago PROP_Afrika__np ;
China+Sem/Plc:China PROP_Afrika__np ;
Daressalam+Sem/Plc:Daressalam PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Dominikanische% Republik+Sem/Plc:Dominikanische% Republik PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Europa+Sem/Plc:Europa PROP_Afrika__np ;
Fifth% Avenue+Sem/Plc:Fifth% Avenue PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Genesis+Sem/Plc:Genesis PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Golf% von% Mexiko+Sem/Plc:Golf% von% Mexiko PROP_Afrika__np ;
Groningen+Sem/Plc:Groningen PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Haiti+Sem/Plc:Haiti PROP_Afrika__np ;
Helsinki+Sem/Plc:Helsinki PROP_Afrika__np ;
Indien+Sem/Plc:Indien PROP_Afrika__np ;
Indonesien+Sem/Plc:Indonesien PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Jugoslawien+Sem/Plc:Jugoslawien PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Kalifornien+Sem/Plc:Kalifornien PROP_Afrika__np ;
Kenia+Sem/Plc:Kenia PROP_Afrika__np ;
Kirgisien+Sem/Plc:Kirgisien PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Klerksdorp+Sem/Plc:Klerksdorp PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Kuba+Sem/Plc:Kuba PROP_Afrika__np ;
La% Paz+Sem/Plc:La% Paz PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Lesotho+Sem/Plc:Lesotho PROP_Afrika__np ;
Ligurien+Sem/Plc:Ligurien PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Malta+Sem/Plc:Malta PROP_Afrika__np ;
Margate+Sem/Plc:Margate PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Mexiko+Sem/Plc:Mexiko PROP_Afrika__np ;
Monaco+Sem/Plc:Monaco PROP_Afrika__np ;
Montréal+Sem/Plc:Montréal PROP_Frankreich__np ;
New% Orleans+Sem/Plc:New% Orleans PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Niederlande+Sem/Plc:Niederlande PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Nigeria+Sem/Plc:Nigeria PROP_Afrika__np ;
Nordamerika+Sem/Plc:Nordamerika PROP_Afrika__np ;
Nordirland+Sem/Plc:Nordirland PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Ozeanien+Sem/Plc:Ozeanien PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Papua-Neuguinea+Sem/Plc:Papua-Neuguinea PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Polen+Sem/Plc:Polen PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Potsdam+Sem/Plc:Potsdam PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Rom+Sem/Plc:Rom PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Ruanda+Sem/Plc:Ruanda PROP_Afrika__np ;
San% Francisco+Sem/Plc:San% Francisco PROP_Afrika__np ;
Schottland+Sem/Plc:Schottland PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Sowjetunion+Sem/Plc:Sowjetunion PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Südafrika+Sem/Plc:Südafrika PROP_Afrika__np ;
Tokio+Sem/Plc:Tokio PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Turkmenistan+Sem/Plc:Turkmenistan PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Vancouver+Sem/Plc:Vancouver PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Wales+Sem/Plc:Wales PROP_Niederlande__np ;
Westsahara+Sem/Plc:Westsahara PROP_Afrika__np ;
Wien+Sem/Plc:Wien PROP_Frankreich__np ;
Amnesty% International+Sem/Org:Amnesty% International PROP_Apertium__np ;
Antarktis+Sem/Plc:Antarktis PROP_Schweiz__np ;
Apertium+Sem/Org:Apertium PROP_Apertium__np ;
Arktis+Sem/Plc:Arktis PROP_Schweiz__np ;
Barentssee+Sem/Plc:Barentssee PROP_Ostsee__np ;
Beaufortsee+Sem/Plc:Beaufortsee PROP_Ostsee__np ;
Beringstraße+Sem/Plc:Beringstraße PROP_Schweiz__np ;
Europäische% Union+Sem/Plc:Europäische% Union PROP_Schweiz__np ;
Hezbollah+Sem/Org:Hezbollah PROP_Apertium__np ;
Javascript+Sem/Obj:Javascript PROP_Apertium__np ;
Kapkolonie+Sem/Plc:Kapkolonie PROP_Schweiz__np ;
Kaspisches% Meer+Sem/Plc:Kaspisches% Meer PROP_Ostsee__np ;
Linux+Sem/Dummy:Linux PROP_Linux__np ;
NATO+Sem/Org:NATO PROP_NATO__np ;
Nordpolarmeer+Sem/Plc:Nordpolarmeer PROP_Ostsee__np ;
Nordsee+Sem/Plc:Nordsee PROP_Ostsee__np ;
Ostsee+Sem/Plc:Ostsee PROP_Ostsee__np ;
Ostsibirische% See+Sem/Plc:Ostsibirische% See PROP_Ostsee__np ;
Schwarzes% Meer+Sem/Plc:Schwarzes% Meer PROP_Ostsee__np ;
Schweiz+Sem/Plc:Schweiz PROP_Schweiz__np ;
Vereinigte% Staaten+Sem/Plc:Vereinigte% Staaten PROP_Vereinte_Nationen__np ;
Vereinigte% Staaten% von% Amerika+Sem/Plc:Vereinigte% Staaten% von% Amerika PROP_Vereinte_Nationen__np ;
Vereinigten% Staaten+Sem/Plc:Vereinigten% Staaten PROP_Vereinte_Nationen__np ;
Vereinigtes% Königreich+Sem/Plc:Vereinigtes% Königreich PROP_Vereinte_Nationen__np ;
Vereinte% Nationen+Sem/Org:Vereinte% Nationen PROP_Vereinte_Nationen__np ;
Wikipedia+Sem/Org:Wikipedia PROP_Wikipedia__np ;
Andrea+Sem/Ant_Fem:Andrea PROP_Maria__np ;
Anna+Sem/Ant_Fem:Anna PROP_Maria__np ;
Anne+Sem/Ant_Fem:Anne PROP_Anrie__np ;
Anrie+Sem/Ant_Fem:Anrie PROP_Anrie__np ;
Beatrice+Sem/Ant_Fem:Beatrice PROP_Maria__np ;
Beatrix+Sem/Ant_Fem:Beatrix PROP_Beatrix__np ;
Brigitte+Sem/Ant_Fem:Brigitte PROP_Maria__np ;
Cassy+Sem/Ant_Fem:Cassy PROP_Maria__np ;
Christel+Sem/Ant_Fem:Christel PROP_Maria__np ;
Claudia+Sem/Ant_Fem:Claudia PROP_Maria__np ;
Dawn+Sem/Ant_Fem:Dawn PROP_Maria__np ;
Edith+Sem/Ant_Fem:Edith PROP_Maria__np ;
Elizabeth+Sem/Ant_Fem:Elizabeth PROP_Anrie__np ;
Els+Sem/Ant_Fem:Els PROP_Beatrix__np ;
Evelyn+Sem/Ant_Fem:Evelyn PROP_Maria__np ;
Gertruida+Sem/Ant_Fem:Gertruida PROP_Maria__np ;
Gwen+Sem/Ant_Fem:Gwen PROP_Maria__np ;
Hermia+Sem/Ant_Fem:Hermia PROP_Maria__np ;
Isobel+Sem/Ant_Fem:Isobel PROP_Maria__np ;
Jenny+Sem/Ant_Fem:Jenny PROP_Maria__np ;
Joyce+Sem/Ant_Fem:Joyce PROP_Maria__np ;
Keira+Sem/Ant_Fem:Keira PROP_Maria__np ;
Lena+Sem/Ant_Fem:Lena PROP_Maria__np ;
Lucie+Sem/Ant_Fem:Lucie PROP_Maria__np ;
Marieke+Sem/Ant_Fem:Marieke PROP_Anrie__np ;
Marlene+Sem/Ant_Fem:Marlene PROP_Maria__np ;
Mieke+Sem/Ant_Fem:Mieke PROP_Anrie__np ;
Nicole+Sem/Ant_Fem:Nicole PROP_Maria__np ;
Rosalind+Sem/Ant_Fem:Rosalind PROP_Maria__np ;
Sonja+Sem/Ant_Fem:Sonja PROP_Maria__np ;
Valerie+Sem/Ant_Fem:Valerie PROP_Maria__np ;
Albert+Sem/Ant_Mal:Albert PROP_Wynand__np ;
Andrew+Sem/Ant_Mal:Andrew PROP_Wynand__np ;
Barry+Sem/Ant_Mal:Barry PROP_Wynand__np ;
Boris+Sem/Ant_Mal:Boris PROP_Wynand__np ;
Charles+Sem/Ant_Mal:Charles PROP_Wynand__np ;
Colin+Sem/Ant_Mal:Colin PROP_Wynand__np ;
Darren+Sem/Ant_Mal:Darren PROP_Wynand__np ;
Don+Sem/Ant_Mal:Don PROP_Wynand__np ;
Edgar+Sem/Ant_Mal:Edgar PROP_Wynand__np ;
Ernest+Sem/Ant_Mal:Ernest PROP_Wynand__np ;
Freddie+Sem/Ant_Mal:Freddie PROP_Wynand__np ;
Gerhard+Sem/Ant_Mal:Gerhard PROP_Wynand__np ;
Gunter+Sem/Ant_Mal:Gunter PROP_Wynand__np ;
Harry+Sem/Ant_Mal:Harry PROP_Harry__np ;
Hendrik+Sem/Ant_Mal:Hendrik PROP_Wynand__np ;
Jean+Sem/Ant_Mal:Jean PROP_Wynand__np ;
Jonas+Sem/Ant_Mal:Jonas PROP_Wynand__np ;
Larry+Sem/Ant_Mal:Larry PROP_Wynand__np ;
Manfred+Sem/Ant_Mal:Manfred PROP_Wynand__np ;
Morris+Sem/Ant_Mal:Morris PROP_Wynand__np ;
Pete+Sem/Ant_Mal:Pete PROP_Wynand__np ;
Robin+Sem/Ant_Mal:Robin PROP_Wynand__np ;
Seth+Sem/Ant_Mal:Seth PROP_Wynand__np ;
Tim+Sem/Ant_Mal:Tim PROP_Wynand__np ;
Yousef+Sem/Ant_Mal:Yousef PROP_Wynand__np ;
Atkinson:Atkinson PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Becker:Becker PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Blake:Blake PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Botha:Botha PROP-SUR_Botha__np ;
Boyd:Boyd PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Burton:Burton PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Carter:Carter PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Collins:Collins PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Daimler:Daimler PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Dalí:Dalí PROP-SUR_Botha__np ;
Dodd:Dodd PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Felton:Felton PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Forcada:Forcada PROP-SUR_Botha__np ;
Gates:Gates PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Hallow:Hallow PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Hendrickson:Hendrickson PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Hughes:Hughes PROP-SUR_Hughes__np ;
Humber:Humber PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Jones:Jones PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Lane:Lane PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
MacGregor:MacGregor PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Mandela:Mandela PROP-SUR_Botha__np ;
Maserati:Maserati PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Miles:Miles PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Newton:Newton PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Pietri:Pietri PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Ramsden:Ramsden PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Shakespeare:Shakespeare PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
Thornton:Thornton PROP-SUR_van_der_Merwe__np ;
